Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1102
Public policy.

The Legislature recognizes the right of all persons, including individuals with developmental disabilities, to enjoy personal liberty and freedom. It is the public policy of the State of Nebraska to encourage persons with developmental disabilities to voluntarily choose their own services. It is also the public policy of the State of Nebraska to use guardians, preferably family members, to make and support service and placement decisions when a person with developmental disabilities is determined by a court to be incompetent, but there are instances in which the threat of harm to other persons in society is sufficient that a court should balance the rights of such person with the interests of society and place care and custody of such person with the State of Nebraska for appropriate treatment and services.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 2.